Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 2. Forensic Science Board.

§ 9.1-1109.
Forensic Science Board; membership.

The Forensic Science Board (the Board) is established as a policy board within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government. The Board shall consist of 15 members as follows:

The Superintendent of the State Police or his designee;

The Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services or his designee;

The Chief Medical Examiner or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Virginia Board of Pharmacy or his designee;

The Attorney General, or his designee;

The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia or his designee;

The Chairman of the Virginia State Crime Commission or his designee;

The Director of the Virginia Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services or his designee;

The Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary or his designee;

The Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee;

Two members of the Scientific Advisory Committee, chosen by the chairman of that committee; and

Three members, appointed by the Governor, from among the citizens of the Commonwealth as follows:

A member of law enforcement;

A member of the Virginia Commonwealth’s Attorneys Association; and

A member who is a criminal defense attorney having specialized knowledge in the area of forensic sciences.

The legislative members shall serve for terms coincident with their terms of office. The members appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of four years, provided that no member shall serve beyond the time when he holds the office or employment by reason of which he was initially eligible for appointment. Any vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, but for the unexpired term.

Notwithstanding any provision of any statute, ordinance, local law, or charter provision to the contrary, membership on the Board shall not disqualify any member from holding any other public office or employment, or cause the forfeiture thereof.

The Board shall elect its chairman and vice-chairman. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. Members shall be paid reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Legislative members shall receive compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive compensation for their services as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

.

The Board shall hold no less than four regular meetings a year. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, the chairman of the Board shall fix the times and places of meetings, either on his own motion or upon written request of any five members of the Board.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881; 2009, c. 323; 2016, c. 199.

Cross references.

As to prohibition against service by legislators on boards, commissions, and councils, and exceptions thereto, see §

2.2-2101

. As to closed meetings rules under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3711

.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “Senate Committee for Courts of Justice” in subdivision A 9. March 10, 2021.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 323 added subdivisions A 9 and A 10 and redesignated former subdivisions A 9 and A 10 as subdivisions A 11 and A 12.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 199 rewrote subdivision A 8, which read: “The Chairman of the Board of the Virginia Institute of Forensic Science and Medicine or his designee.”

§ 9.1-1110.
Functions of Forensic Science Board.

The Board shall have the power and duty to:

Adopt regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), for the administration of (i) this chapter or (ii) §§

18.2-268.6

,

18.2-268.9

,

19.2-188.1

, and

19.2-310.5

and for any provisions of the Code as they relate to the responsibilities of the Department. Any proposed regulations concerning the privacy, confidentiality, and security of criminal justice information or DNA identification shall be submitted for review and comment to any board, commission, or committee or other body that may be established by the General Assembly to regulate the privacy, confidentiality, and security of information collected and maintained by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof;

Develop and establish program and fiscal standards and goals governing the operations of the Department;

Ensure the development of long-range programs and plans for the incorporation of new technologies as they become available;

Review and comment on all budgets and requests for appropriations for the Department prior to their submission to the Governor and on all applications for federal funds;

Monitor the activities of the Department and its effectiveness in implementing the standards and goals of the Board;

Advise the Governor, Director, and General Assembly on matters relating to the Department and forensic science in general;

Review, amend, and approve recommendations of the Scientific Advisory Committee;

Monitor the receipt, administration, and expenditure of all funds and other assistance available for carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

Approve Department applications for grants from the United States government or any other source in carrying out the purposes of this chapter and approve of acceptance of any and all donations both real and personal, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same. With regard to any grants of money from a governmental or public agency, the Board may delegate or assign the duties under this subdivision to the chairman of the Board who may, with the concurrence of the vice-chairman and in consultation with the Director, make such determinations. Any grants or donations received pursuant to this section shall be detailed in the annual report of the Board. The report shall include the identity of the donor, the nature of the transaction, and the conditions, if any. Any moneys received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the account of the Department;

Monitor all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of the duties of the Department and execution of its powers under this chapter, including but not limited to, contracts with the United States, units of general local government or combinations thereof, in Virginia or other states, and with agencies and departments of the Commonwealth; and

Recommend actions to foster and promote coordination and cooperation between the Department and the user programs that are served.

By November 1 of each year, the Board shall review and make recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Crime Commission concerning:

New major programs and plans for the activities of the Department and elimination of programs no longer needed;

Policy and priorities in response to agency needs;

General fiscal year operational budget and any major changes in appropriated funds;

Actions to foster and promote coordination and cooperation between the Department and the user programs which are served;

Rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter; and

Any recommendations submitted to the Board or the Director by the Scientific Advisory Committee.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881; 2006, cc. 327, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 473, cl. 3, effective July 1, 2020, provides: “That information about the use of the Physical Evidence Recovery Kit Tracking System shall be reported in the Forensic Science Board’s annual report that is submitted by November 1 of each year in accordance with subsection B of §

9.1-1110

of the Code of Virginia.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” in subsection B. March 10, 2021.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 327 and 551 are identical, and substituted “Monitor the receipt, administration, and expenditure of” for “Receive, administer, and expand” in subdivision A 8; in subdivision A 9, inserted the second sentence, substituted “grants or donations received” for “arrangements” near the beginning of the third sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “To these ends, the Board shall have the power to comply with conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary”; and substituted “the duties of the Department” for “its duties” in subdivision A 10.

§ 9.1-1111.
Scientific Advisory Committee; membership.

The Scientific Advisory Committee is hereby established as an advisory board within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government. The Scientific Advisory Committee (the Committee) shall consist of 13 members, consisting of the Director of the Department, and 12 members appointed by the Governor as follows: a director of a private or federal forensic laboratory located in the Commonwealth; a forensic scientist or any other person, with an advanced degree, who has received substantial education, training, or experience in the subject of laboratory standards or quality assurance regulation and monitoring; a forensic scientist with an advanced degree who has received substantial education, training, or experience in the discipline of molecular biology; a forensic scientist with an advanced degree and having experience in the discipline of population genetics; a scientist with an advanced degree and having experience in the discipline of forensic chemistry; a scientist with an advanced degree and having experience in the discipline of forensic biology; a forensic scientist or any other person, with an advanced degree who has received substantial education, training, or experience in the discipline of trace evidence; a scientist with a doctoral degree and having experience in the discipline of forensic toxicology, who is certified by the American Board of Forensic Toxicologists; a member of the Board of the International Association for Identification when initially appointed; a member of the Board of the Association of Firearms and Toolmark Examiners when initially appointed; a member of the International Association for Chemical Testing; and a member of the American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors.

Members of the Committee initially appointed shall serve the following terms: four members shall serve a term of one year, four members shall serve a term of two years, and four members shall serve a term of four years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for a term of four years. A vacancy other than by expiration of term shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

Members of the Committee shall be paid reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, and shall receive compensation for their services as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881; 2014, cc. 102, 253.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 102 and 253 are identical, and in the first paragraph inserted “when initially appointed” twice and made a stylistic change.

§ 9.1-1112.
Meetings and chairman.

The Committee shall meet twice a year in the City of Richmond and at such other times and places as it determines or as directed by the Governor or the Forensic Science Board. A chairman shall be elected from among the members appointed by the Governor. Staff to the Committee shall be provided by the Department of Forensic Science.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.

§ 9.1-1113.
Functions of the Scientific Advisory Committee.

The Committee may review laboratory operations of the Department and make recommendations concerning the quality and timeliness of services furnished to user agencies.

The Committee shall review and make recommendations as necessary to the Director of the Department and the Forensic Science Board concerning:

New scientific programs, protocols, and methods of testing;

Plans for the implementation of new programs, sustaining existing programs and improving upon them where possible, and the elimination of programs no longer needed;

Protocols for testing and examination methods, and guidelines for the presentation of results in court; and

Qualification standards for the various scientists of the Department, including the Director.

Upon request of the Director of the Department, the Forensic Science Board, or the Governor, the Committee shall review analytical work, reports, and conclusions of scientists employed by the Department. The Committee shall recommend to the Forensic Science Board a review process for the Department to use in instances where there has been an allegation of misidentification or other testing error made by the Department during its examination of evidence.

History.

2005, cc. 868, 881.